test/src/gt-norm-yamls/M-all_gt-norm.yaml
  Noun - kasvot - ok : # Noun 'tid' - ei tsekattu
     kasvot+N+Pl+Nom: kasvot
     kasvot+N+Pl+Gen: kasvoitten
     kasvot+N+Pl+Par: kasvoi
     kasvot+N+Pl+Tra: kasvoiksi
     kasvot+N+Pl+Abe: kasvoitta
     kasvot+N+Pl+Ine: kasvoissa
     kasvot+N+Pl+Ela: kasvoista
     kasvot+N+Pl+Ill: kasvhoin
     kasvot+N+Pl+Ade: kasvoila
     kasvot+N+Pl+Abl: kasvoilta
     kasvot+N+Pl+All: kasvoile
     kasvot+N+Pl+Ess: kasvoina
     kasvot+N+Pl+Com: kasvoine


# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - kauhee - ok : # Noun 'borg' - ok
     kauhee+N+Sg+Nom: kauhee
     kauhee+N+Sg+Gen: kauheen
     kauhee+N+Sg+Par: kauheeta
     kauhee+N+Sg+Tra: kauheeksi
     kauhee+N+Sg+Abe: kauheetta
     kauhee+N+Sg+Ine: kauheessa
     kauhee+N+Sg+Ela: kauheesta
     kauhee+N+Sg+Ill: kauheesseen
     kauhee+N+Sg+Ade: kauheela
     kauhee+N+Sg+Abl: kauheelta
     kauhee+N+Sg+All: kauheele
     kauhee+N+Sg+Ess: kauheena
     kauhee+N+Pl+Nom: kauheet
     kauhee+N+Pl+Gen: kauheitten
     kauhee+N+Pl+Par: kauheita
     kauhee+N+Pl+Tra: kauheiksi
     kauhee+N+Pl+Abe: kauheitta
     kauhee+N+Pl+Ine: kauheissa
     kauhee+N+Pl+Ela: kauheista
     kauhee+N+Pl+Ill: kauheissiin
     kauhee+N+Pl+Ade: kauheila
     kauhee+N+Pl+Abl: kauheilta
     kauhee+N+Pl+All: kauheile
     kauhee+N+Pl+Ess: kauheina
     kauhee+N+Pl+Com: kauheine


# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: linnrun analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - kieli - ei tsekattu : # Noun 'år' - ei tsekattu
     kieli+N+Sg+Nom: kieli
     kieli+N+Sg+Gen: kielen
     kieli+N+Sg+Par: kieltä
     kieli+N+Sg+Tra: kieleksi
     kieli+N+Sg+Abe: kielettä
     kieli+N+Sg+Ine: kielessä
     kieli+N+Sg+Ela: kielestä
     kieli+N+Sg+Ill: kielheen
     kieli+N+Sg+Ade: kielelä
     kieli+N+Sg+Abl: kieleltä
     kieli+N+Sg+All: kielele
     kieli+N+Sg+Ess: kielenä
     kieli+N+Pl+Nom: kielet
     kieli+N+Pl+Gen: kieliin
     kieli+N+Pl+Par: kielii
     kieli+N+Pl+Tra: kieliksi
     kieli+N+Pl+Abe: kielittä
     kieli+N+Pl+Ine: kielissä
     kieli+N+Pl+Ela: kielistä
     kieli+N+Pl+Ill: kielhiin
     kieli+N+Pl+Ade: kielilä
     kieli+N+Pl+Abl: kieliltä
     kieli+N+Pl+All: kielile
     kieli+N+Pl+Ess: kielinä
     kieli+N+Pl+Com: kieline


# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - kirves - ok : # Noun 'øks' - ok
     kirves+N+Sg+Nom: kirves
     kirves+N+Sg+Gen: kirvheen
     kirves+N+Sg+Par: kirvestä
     kirves+N+Sg+Tra: kirvheeksi
     kirves+N+Sg+Abe: kirvheettä
     kirves+N+Sg+Ine: kirvheessä
     kirves+N+Sg+Ela: kirvheestä
     kirves+N+Sg+Ill: kirvheesseen
     kirves+N+Sg+Ade: kirvheelä
     kirves+N+Sg+Abl: kirvheeltä
     kirves+N+Sg+All: kirvheele
     kirves+N+Sg+Ess: kirvheenä
     kirves+N+Pl+Nom: kirvheet
     kirves+N+Pl+Gen: kirvheitten
     kirves+N+Pl+Par: kirvheitä
     kirves+N+Pl+Tra: kirvheiksi
     kirves+N+Pl+Abe: kirvheittä
     kirves+N+Pl+Ine: kirvheissä
     kirves+N+Pl+Ela: kirvheistä
     kirves+N+Pl+Ill: kirvheissiin
     kirves+N+Pl+Ade: kirvheilä
     kirves+N+Pl+Abl: kirvheiltä
     kirves+N+Pl+All: kirvheile
     kirves+N+Pl+Ess: kirvheinä
     kirves+N+Pl+Com: kirvheine


# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - kulkkiija - ei tsekattu : # Noun 'borg' - ei tsekattu
     kulkkiija+N+Sg+Nom: kulkkiija
     kulkkiija+N+Sg+Gen: kulkkiijan
     kulkkiija+N+Sg+Par: kulkkiijaa
     kulkkiija+N+Sg+Tra: kulkkiijaksi
     kulkkiija+N+Sg+Abe: kulkkiijatta
     kulkkiija+N+Sg+Ine: kulkkiijassa
     kulkkiija+N+Sg+Ela: kulkkiijasta
     kulkkiija+N+Sg+Ill: kulkkiijhaan
     kulkkiija+N+Sg+Ade: kulkkiijalla
     kulkkiija+N+Sg+Abl: kulkkiijalta
     kulkkiija+N+Sg+All: kulkkiijalle
     kulkkiija+N+Sg+Ess: kulkkiijanna
     kulkkiija+N+Pl+Nom: kulkkiijat
     kulkkiija+N+Pl+Gen: kulkkiijoitten
     kulkkiija+N+Pl+Par: kulkkiijoita
     kulkkiija+N+Pl+Tra: kulkkiijoiksi
     kulkkiija+N+Pl+Abe: kulkkiijoitta
     kulkkiija+N+Pl+Ine: kulkkiijoissa
     kulkkiija+N+Pl+Ela: kulkkiijoista
     kulkkiija+N+Pl+Ill: kulkkiijhoin
     kulkkiija+N+Pl+Ade: kulkkiijoilla
     kulkkiija+N+Pl+Abl: kulkkiijoilta
     kulkkiija+N+Pl+All: kulkkiijoille
     kulkkiija+N+Pl+Ess: kulkkiijoina
     kulkkiija+N+Pl+Com: kulkkiijoine


# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: linnrun analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - lapsi - ok : # Noun 'år' - ok
     lapsi+N+Sg+Nom: lapsi
     lapsi+N+Sg+Gen: lapsen
     lapsi+N+Sg+Par: lasta
     lapsi+N+Sg+Tra: lapseksi
     lapsi+N+Sg+Abe: lapsetta
     lapsi+N+Sg+Ine: lapsessa
     lapsi+N+Sg+Ela: lapsesta
     lapsi+N+Sg+Ill: lapsheen
     lapsi+N+Sg+Ade: lapsela
     lapsi+N+Sg+Abl: lapselta
     lapsi+N+Sg+All: lapsele
     lapsi+N+Sg+Ess: lapsena
     lapsi+N+Pl+Nom: lapset
     lapsi+N+Pl+Gen: lapsiin
     lapsi+N+Pl+Par: lapsii
     lapsi+N+Pl+Tra: lapsiksi
     lapsi+N+Pl+Abe: lapsitta
     lapsi+N+Pl+Ine: lapsissa
     lapsi+N+Pl+Ela: lapsista
     lapsi+N+Pl+Ill: lapshiin
     lapsi+N+Pl+Ade: lapsila
     lapsi+N+Pl+Abl: lapsilta
     lapsi+N+Pl+All: lapsile
     lapsi+N+Pl+Ess: lapsina
     lapsi+N+Pl+Com: lapsine


# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - linna - ok : # Noun 'borg' - ok
     linna+N+Sg+Nom: linna
     linna+N+Sg+Gen: linnan
     linna+N+Sg+Par: linnaa
     linna+N+Sg+Tra: linnaksi
     linna+N+Sg+Abe: linnatta
     linna+N+Sg+Ine: linnassa
     linna+N+Sg+Ela: linnasta
     linna+N+Sg+Ill: linnhaan
     linna+N+Sg+Ade: linnala
     linna+N+Sg+Abl: linnalta
     linna+N+Sg+All: linnale
     linna+N+Sg+Ess: linnana
     linna+N+Pl+Nom: linnat
     linna+N+Pl+Gen: linnoin
     linna+N+Pl+Par: linnoi
     linna+N+Pl+Tra: linnoiksi
     linna+N+Pl+Abe: linnoitta
     linna+N+Pl+Ine: linnoissa
     linna+N+Pl+Ela: linnoista
     linna+N+Pl+Ill: linnhoin
     linna+N+Pl+Ade: linnoila
     linna+N+Pl+Abl: linnoilta
     linna+N+Pl+All: linnoile
     linna+N+Pl+Ess: linnoina
     linna+N+Pl+Com: linnoine
     


# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - lumi - ok : # Noun 'snø' - ok
     lumi+N+Sg+Nom: lumi
     lumi+N+Sg+Gen: lumen
     lumi+N+Sg+Par: lunta
     lumi+N+Sg+Tra: lumeksi
     lumi+N+Sg+Abe: lumetta
     lumi+N+Sg+Ine: lumessa
     lumi+N+Sg+Ela: lumesta
     lumi+N+Sg+Ill: lumheen
     lumi+N+Sg+Ade: lumela
     lumi+N+Sg+Abl: lumelta
     lumi+N+Sg+All: lumele
     lumi+N+Sg+Ess: lumena
     lumi+N+Pl+Nom: lumet
     lumi+N+Pl+Ine: lumissa
     lumi+N+Pl+Ela: lumista
     lumi+N+Pl+Ill: lumhiin
     lumi+N+Pl+Ade: lumila
     lumi+N+Pl+Abl: lumilta
     lumi+N+Pl+All: lumile
     lumi+N+Pl+Ess: lumina
     lumi+N+Pl+Gen: lummiin   
     lumi+N+Pl+Par: lummii
     lumi+N+Pl+Tra: lumiksi
     lumi+N+Pl+Abe: lumitta
     lumi+N+Pl+Com: lumine


# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - maa - ok : # Noun 'borg' - ok
     maa+N+Sg+Nom: maa
     maa+N+Sg+Gen: maan
     maa+N+Sg+Par: maata
     maa+N+Sg+Tra: maaksi
     maa+N+Sg+Abe: maatta
     maa+N+Sg+Ine: maassa
     maa+N+Sg+Ela: maasta
     maa+N+Sg+Ill: maahan
     maa+N+Sg+Ade: maala
     maa+N+Sg+Abl: maalta
     maa+N+Sg+All: maale
     maa+N+Sg+Ess: maana
     maa+N+Pl+Nom: maat
     maa+N+Pl+Gen: maitten
     maa+N+Pl+Par: maita
     maa+N+Pl+Tra: maiksi
     maa+N+Pl+Abe: maitta
     maa+N+Pl+Ine: maissa
     maa+N+Pl+Ela: maista
     maa+N+Pl+Ill: maihin
     maa+N+Pl+Ade: maila
     maa+N+Pl+Abl: mailta
     maa+N+Pl+All: maile
     maa+N+Pl+Ess: maina
     maa+N+Pl+Com: maine


# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - meininki - ei tsekattu : # Noun 'borg' - ei tsekattu
     meininki+N+Sg+Nom: meininki
     meininki+N+Sg+Gen: meiningin
     meininki+N+Sg+Par: meininkkii
     meininki+N+Sg+Tra: meiningiksi
     meininki+N+Sg+Abe: meiningittä
     meininki+N+Sg+Ine: meiningissä
     meininki+N+Sg+Ela: meiningistä
     meininki+N+Sg+Ill: meininkhiin
     meininki+N+Sg+Ade: meiningillä
     meininki+N+Sg+Abl: meiningiltä
     meininki+N+Sg+All: meiningille
     meininki+N+Sg+Ess: meininkinnä
     meininki+N+Pl+Nom: meiningit
     meininki+N+Pl+Gen: meiningiitten
     meininki+N+Pl+Par: meininkkiitä
     meininki+N+Pl+Tra: [meiningiiksi, meininkiiksi]
     meininki+N+Pl+Abe: meiningiittä
     meininki+N+Pl+Ine: meiningiissä
     meininki+N+Pl+Ela: meiningiistä
     meininki+N+Pl+Ill: meininkhiin
     meininki+N+Pl+Ade: meiningiillä
     meininki+N+Pl+Abl: meiningiiltä
     meininki+N+Pl+All: meiningiille
     meininki+N+Pl+Ess: meininkkiinä
     meininki+N+Pl+Com: meininkkiine


# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - nainen - ok : # Noun 'menneske' - ok
     nainen+N+Sg+Nom: nainen
     nainen+N+Sg+Gen: naisen
     nainen+N+Sg+Par: naista
     nainen+N+Sg+Tra: naiseksi
     nainen+N+Sg+Abe: naisetta
     nainen+N+Sg+Ine: naisessa
     nainen+N+Sg+Ela: naisesta
     nainen+N+Sg+Ill: naisheen
     nainen+N+Sg+Ade: naisela
     nainen+N+Sg+Abl: naiselta
     nainen+N+Sg+All: naisele
     nainen+N+Sg+Ess: naisena
     nainen+N+Pl+Nom: naiset
     nainen+N+Pl+Gen: naisten
     nainen+N+Pl+Par: naissii
     nainen+N+Pl+Tra: naisiksi
     nainen+N+Pl+Abe: naisitta
     nainen+N+Pl+Ine: naisissa
     nainen+N+Pl+Ela: naisista
     nainen+N+Pl+Ill: naishiin
     nainen+N+Pl+Ade: naisila
     nainen+N+Pl+Abl: naisilta
     nainen+N+Pl+All: naisile
     nainen+N+Pl+Ess: naisina
     nainen+N+Pl+Com: naisine


# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - opettaaja - ei tsekattu : # Noun 'borg' - ei tsekattu
     opettaaja+N+Sg+Nom: opettaaja
     opettaaja+N+Sg+Gen: opettaajan
     opettaaja+N+Sg+Par: opettaajaa
     opettaaja+N+Sg+Tra: opettaajaksi
     opettaaja+N+Sg+Abe: opettaajatta
     opettaaja+N+Sg+Ine: opettaajassa
     opettaaja+N+Sg+Ela: opettaajasta
     opettaaja+N+Sg+Ill: opettaajhaan
     opettaaja+N+Sg+Ade: opettaajala
     opettaaja+N+Sg+Abl: opettaajalta
     opettaaja+N+Sg+All: opettaajale
     opettaaja+N+Sg+Ess: opettaajana
     opettaaja+N+Pl+Nom: opettaajat
     opettaaja+N+Pl+Gen: opettaajiitten
     opettaaja+N+Pl+Par: opettaajiita
     opettaaja+N+Pl+Tra: opettaajiiksi
     opettaaja+N+Pl+Abe: opettaajiitta
     opettaaja+N+Pl+Ine: opettaajiissa
     opettaaja+N+Pl+Ela: opettaajiista
     opettaaja+N+Pl+Ill: opettaajhiin
     opettaaja+N+Pl+Ade: opettaajiila
     opettaaja+N+Pl+Abl: opettaajiilta
     opettaaja+N+Pl+All: opettaajiile
     opettaaja+N+Pl+Ess: opettaajiina
     opettaaja+N+Pl+Com: opettaajiine


# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - paivukko - ei tsekattu : # Noun 'borg' - ei tsekattu
     paivukko+N+Sg+Nom: paivukko
     paivukko+N+Sg+Gen: paivukon
     paivukko+N+Sg+Par: paivukkoo
     paivukko+N+Sg+Tra: paivukoksi
     paivukko+N+Sg+Abe: paivukotta
     paivukko+N+Sg+Ine: paivukossa
     paivukko+N+Sg+Ela: paivukosta
     paivukko+N+Sg+Ill: paivukkhoon
     paivukko+N+Sg+Ade: paivukolla
     paivukko+N+Sg+Abl: paivukolta
     paivukko+N+Sg+All: paivukolle
     paivukko+N+Sg+Ess: paivukkonna
     paivukko+N+Pl+Nom: paivukot
     paivukko+N+Pl+Gen: paivukoitten
     paivukko+N+Pl+Par: paivukoita
     paivukko+N+Pl+Tra: paivukoiksi
     paivukko+N+Pl+Abe: paivukoitta
     paivukko+N+Pl+Ine: paivukoissa
     paivukko+N+Pl+Ela: paivukoista
     paivukko+N+Pl+Ill: paivukkhoin
     paivukko+N+Pl+Ade: paivukoilla
     paivukko+N+Pl+Abl: paivukoilta
     paivukko+N+Pl+All: paivukoille
     paivukko+N+Pl+Ess: paivukkoina
     paivukko+N+Pl+Com: paivukkoine


# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 
